data/grammar/fst/endings-generated.lexc
LEXICON TnEndingsGenerated
++k+tn-nom-d:TNNOMDk # ;
++k+tn-nom-d:TNNOMDk QParticles ;
++k+tn-nom-d:k # ;
++k+tn-nom-d:k QParticles ;
++k+tn-nom-d:iik # ;
++k+tn-nom-d:iik QParticles ;
++k+tn-nom-d:SUPPRTNNOMDk # ;
++k+tn-nom-d:SUPPRTNNOMDk QParticles ;
++k+tn-nom-d:SUPPRk # ;
++k+tn-nom-d:SUPPRk QParticles ;
++it+tn-nom-p:DECAPit # ;
++it+tn-nom-p:DECAPit QParticles ;
++it+tn-nom-p:it # ;
++it+tn-nom-p:it QParticles ;
++it+tn-nom-p:SUPPRDECAPit # ;
++it+tn-nom-p:SUPPRDECAPit QParticles ;
++up+tn-gen-s:DECAPup # ;
++up+tn-gen-s:DECAPup QParticles ;
++up+tn-gen-s:SUPPRDECAPup # ;
++up+tn-gen-s:SUPPRDECAPup QParticles ;
++up+tn-gen-s:iup # ;
++up+tn-gen-s:iup QParticles ;
++k+tn-gen-d:TNNOMDk # ;
++k+tn-gen-d:TNNOMDk QParticles ;
++k+tn-gen-d:k # ;
++k+tn-gen-d:k QParticles ;
++k+tn-gen-d:iik # ;
++k+tn-gen-d:iik QParticles ;
++k+tn-gen-d:SUPPRTNNOMDk # ;
++k+tn-gen-d:SUPPRTNNOMDk QParticles ;
++k+tn-gen-d:SUPPRk # ;
++k+tn-gen-d:SUPPRk QParticles ;
++it+tn-gen-p:DECAPit # ;
++it+tn-gen-p:DECAPit QParticles ;
++it+tn-gen-p:it # ;
++it+tn-gen-p:it QParticles ;
++it+tn-gen-p:SUPPRDECAPit # ;
++it+tn-gen-p:SUPPRDECAPit QParticles ;
++mik+tn-acc-s:mik # ;
++mik+tn-acc-s:mik QParticles ;
++mik+tn-acc-s:imik # ;
++mik+tn-acc-s:imik QParticles ;
++mik+tn-acc-s:NASALmik # ;
++mik+tn-acc-s:NASALmik QParticles ;
++mik+tn-acc-s:SUPPRmik # ;
++mik+tn-acc-s:SUPPRmik QParticles ;
++ngnik+tn-acc-d:TNNOMDngnik # ;
++ngnik+tn-acc-d:TNNOMDngnik QParticles ;
++ngnik+tn-acc-d:ngnik # ;
++ngnik+tn-acc-d:ngnik QParticles ;
++ngnik+tn-acc-d:iingnik # ;
++ngnik+tn-acc-d:iingnik QParticles ;
++ngnik+tn-acc-d:SUPPRTNNOMDngnik # ;
++ngnik+tn-acc-d:SUPPRTNNOMDngnik QParticles ;
++ngnik+tn-acc-d:SUPPRngnik # ;
++ngnik+tn-acc-d:SUPPRngnik QParticles ;
++nik+tn-acc-p:nik # ;
++nik+tn-acc-p:nik QParticles ;
++nik+tn-acc-p:inik # ;
++nik+tn-acc-p:inik QParticles ;
++nik+tn-acc-p:NASALnik # ;
++nik+tn-acc-p:NASALnik QParticles ;
++nik+tn-acc-p:SUPPRnik # ;
++nik+tn-acc-p:SUPPRnik QParticles ;
++mut+tn-dat-s:mut # ;
++mut+tn-dat-s:mut QParticles ;
++mut+tn-dat-s:mut AfterDatCaseEnding ;
++mut+tn-dat-s:imut # ;
++mut+tn-dat-s:imut QParticles ;
++mut+tn-dat-s:imut AfterDatCaseEnding ;
++mut+tn-dat-s:SUPPRmut # ;
++mut+tn-dat-s:SUPPRmut QParticles ;
++mut+tn-dat-s:SUPPRmut AfterDatCaseEnding ;
++mut+tn-dat-s:NASALmut # ;
++mut+tn-dat-s:NASALmut QParticles ;
++mut+tn-dat-s:NASALmut AfterDatCaseEnding ;
++ngnut+tn-dat-d:TNNOMDngnut # ;
++ngnut+tn-dat-d:TNNOMDngnut QParticles ;
++ngnut+tn-dat-d:TNNOMDngnut AfterDatCaseEnding ;
++ngnut+tn-dat-d:ngnut # ;
++ngnut+tn-dat-d:ngnut QParticles ;
++ngnut+tn-dat-d:ngnut AfterDatCaseEnding ;
++ngnut+tn-dat-d:iingnut # ;
++ngnut+tn-dat-d:iingnut QParticles ;
++ngnut+tn-dat-d:iingnut AfterDatCaseEnding ;
++ngnut+tn-dat-d:SUPPRTNNOMDngnut # ;
++ngnut+tn-dat-d:SUPPRTNNOMDngnut QParticles ;
++ngnut+tn-dat-d:SUPPRTNNOMDngnut AfterDatCaseEnding ;
++ngnut+tn-dat-d:SUPPRngnut # ;
++ngnut+tn-dat-d:SUPPRngnut QParticles ;
++ngnut+tn-dat-d:SUPPRngnut AfterDatCaseEnding ;
++nut+tn-dat-p:nut # ;
++nut+tn-dat-p:nut QParticles ;
++nut+tn-dat-p:nut AfterDatCaseEnding ;
++nut+tn-dat-p:inut # ;
++nut+tn-dat-p:inut QParticles ;
++nut+tn-dat-p:inut AfterDatCaseEnding ;
++nut+tn-dat-p:SUPPRnut # ;
++nut+tn-dat-p:SUPPRnut QParticles ;
++nut+tn-dat-p:SUPPRnut AfterDatCaseEnding ;
++nut+tn-dat-p:NASALnut # ;
++nut+tn-dat-p:NASALnut QParticles ;
++nut+tn-dat-p:NASALnut AfterDatCaseEnding ;
++mit+tn-abl-s:mit # ;
++mit+tn-abl-s:mit QParticles ;
++mit+tn-abl-s:mit AfterAblCaseEnding ;
++mit+tn-abl-s:imit # ;
++mit+tn-abl-s:imit QParticles ;
++mit+tn-abl-s:imit AfterAblCaseEnding ;
++mit+tn-abl-s:NASALmit # ;
++mit+tn-abl-s:NASALmit QParticles ;
++mit+tn-abl-s:NASALmit AfterAblCaseEnding ;
++mit+tn-abl-s:SUPPRmit # ;
++mit+tn-abl-s:SUPPRmit QParticles ;
++mit+tn-abl-s:SUPPRmit AfterAblCaseEnding ;
++ngnit+tn-abl-d:TNNOMDngnit # ;
++ngnit+tn-abl-d:TNNOMDngnit QParticles ;
++ngnit+tn-abl-d:TNNOMDngnit AfterAblCaseEnding ;
++ngnit+tn-abl-d:ngnit # ;
++ngnit+tn-abl-d:ngnit QParticles ;
++ngnit+tn-abl-d:ngnit AfterAblCaseEnding ;
++ngnit+tn-abl-d:iingnit # ;
++ngnit+tn-abl-d:iingnit QParticles ;
++ngnit+tn-abl-d:iingnit AfterAblCaseEnding ;
++ngnit+tn-abl-d:SUPPRTNNOMDngnit # ;
++ngnit+tn-abl-d:SUPPRTNNOMDngnit QParticles ;
++ngnit+tn-abl-d:SUPPRTNNOMDngnit AfterAblCaseEnding ;
++ngnit+tn-abl-d:SUPPRngnit # ;
++ngnit+tn-abl-d:SUPPRngnit QParticles ;
++ngnit+tn-abl-d:SUPPRngnit AfterAblCaseEnding ;
++nit+tn-abl-p:nit # ;
++nit+tn-abl-p:nit QParticles ;
++nit+tn-abl-p:nit AfterAblCaseEnding ;
++nit+tn-abl-p:init # ;
++nit+tn-abl-p:init QParticles ;
++nit+tn-abl-p:init AfterAblCaseEnding ;
++nit+tn-abl-p:NASALnit # ;
++nit+tn-abl-p:NASALnit QParticles ;
++nit+tn-abl-p:NASALnit AfterAblCaseEnding ;
++nit+tn-abl-p:SUPPRnit # ;
++nit+tn-abl-p:SUPPRnit QParticles ;
++nit+tn-abl-p:SUPPRnit AfterAblCaseEnding ;
++mi+tn-loc-s:mi # ;
++mi+tn-loc-s:mi QParticles ;
++mi+tn-loc-s:mi AfterLocCaseEnding ;
++mi+tn-loc-s:imi # ;
++mi+tn-loc-s:imi QParticles ;
++mi+tn-loc-s:imi AfterLocCaseEnding ;
++mi+tn-loc-s:NASALmi # ;
++mi+tn-loc-s:NASALmi QParticles ;
++mi+tn-loc-s:NASALmi AfterLocCaseEnding ;
++mi+tn-loc-s:SUPPRmi # ;
++mi+tn-loc-s:SUPPRmi QParticles ;
++mi+tn-loc-s:SUPPRmi AfterLocCaseEnding ;
++ngni+tn-loc-d:TNNOMDngni # ;
++ngni+tn-loc-d:TNNOMDngni QParticles ;
++ngni+tn-loc-d:TNNOMDngni AfterLocCaseEnding ;
++ngni+tn-loc-d:ngni # ;
++ngni+tn-loc-d:ngni QParticles ;
++ngni+tn-loc-d:ngni AfterLocCaseEnding ;
++ngni+tn-loc-d:iingni # ;
++ngni+tn-loc-d:iingni QParticles ;
++ngni+tn-loc-d:iingni AfterLocCaseEnding ;
++ngni+tn-loc-d:SUPPRTNNOMDngni # ;
++ngni+tn-loc-d:SUPPRTNNOMDngni QParticles ;
++ngni+tn-loc-d:SUPPRTNNOMDngni AfterLocCaseEnding ;
++ngni+tn-loc-d:SUPPRngni # ;
++ngni+tn-loc-d:SUPPRngni QParticles ;
++ngni+tn-loc-d:SUPPRngni AfterLocCaseEnding ;
++ni+tn-loc-p:ni # ;
++ni+tn-loc-p:ni QParticles ;
++ni+tn-loc-p:ni AfterLocCaseEnding ;
++ni+tn-loc-p:ini # ;
++ni+tn-loc-p:ini QParticles ;
++ni+tn-loc-p:ini AfterLocCaseEnding ;
++ni+tn-loc-p:NASALni # ;
++ni+tn-loc-p:NASALni QParticles ;
++ni+tn-loc-p:NASALni AfterLocCaseEnding ;
++ni+tn-loc-p:mi # ;
++ni+tn-loc-p:mi QParticles ;
++ni+tn-loc-p:mi AfterLocCaseEnding ;
++ni+tn-loc-p:SUPPRni # ;
++ni+tn-loc-p:SUPPRni QParticles ;
++ni+tn-loc-p:SUPPRni AfterLocCaseEnding ;
++tut+tn-sim-s:tut # ;
++tut+tn-sim-s:tut QParticles ;
++tut+tn-sim-s:tut AfterSimCaseEnding ;
++tut+tn-sim-s:KGUARDtut # ;
++tut+tn-sim-s:KGUARDtut QParticles ;
++tut+tn-sim-s:KGUARDtut AfterSimCaseEnding ;
++tut+tn-sim-s:itut # ;
++tut+tn-sim-s:itut QParticles ;
++tut+tn-sim-s:itut AfterSimCaseEnding ;
++ktut+tn-sim-d:TNNOMDktut # ;
++ktut+tn-sim-d:TNNOMDktut QParticles ;
++ktut+tn-sim-d:TNNOMDktut AfterSimCaseEnding ;
++ktut+tn-sim-d:ktut # ;
++ktut+tn-sim-d:ktut QParticles ;
++ktut+tn-sim-d:ktut AfterSimCaseEnding ;
++ktut+tn-sim-d:TNNOMDktitut # ;
++ktut+tn-sim-d:TNNOMDktitut QParticles ;
++ktut+tn-sim-d:TNNOMDktitut AfterSimCaseEnding ;
++ktut+tn-sim-d:ktitut # ;
++ktut+tn-sim-d:ktitut QParticles ;
++ktut+tn-sim-d:ktitut AfterSimCaseEnding ;
++ktut+tn-sim-d:iiktut # ;
++ktut+tn-sim-d:iiktut QParticles ;
++ktut+tn-sim-d:iiktut AfterSimCaseEnding ;
++ktut+tn-sim-d:iiktitut # ;
++ktut+tn-sim-d:iiktitut QParticles ;
++ktut+tn-sim-d:iiktitut AfterSimCaseEnding ;
++ktut+tn-sim-d:SUPPRTNNOMDktut # ;
++ktut+tn-sim-d:SUPPRTNNOMDktut QParticles ;
++ktut+tn-sim-d:SUPPRTNNOMDktut AfterSimCaseEnding ;
++ktut+tn-sim-d:SUPPRktut # ;
++ktut+tn-sim-d:SUPPRktut QParticles ;
++ktut+tn-sim-d:SUPPRktut AfterSimCaseEnding ;
++ktut+tn-sim-d:SUPPRTNNOMDktitut # ;
++ktut+tn-sim-d:SUPPRTNNOMDktitut QParticles ;
++ktut+tn-sim-d:SUPPRTNNOMDktitut AfterSimCaseEnding ;
++ktut+tn-sim-d:SUPPRktitut # ;
++ktut+tn-sim-d:SUPPRktitut QParticles ;
++ktut+tn-sim-d:SUPPRktitut AfterSimCaseEnding ;
++titut+tn-sim-p:titut # ;
++titut+tn-sim-p:titut QParticles ;
++titut+tn-sim-p:titut AfterSimCaseEnding ;
++titut+tn-sim-p:KGUARDtitut # ;
++titut+tn-sim-p:KGUARDtitut QParticles ;
++titut+tn-sim-p:KGUARDtitut AfterSimCaseEnding ;
++titut+tn-sim-p:ititut # ;
++titut+tn-sim-p:ititut QParticles ;
++titut+tn-sim-p:ititut AfterSimCaseEnding ;
++kkut+tn-via-s:kkut # ;
++kkut+tn-via-s:kkut QParticles ;
++kkut+tn-via-s:kkut AfterViaCaseEnding ;
++kkut+tn-via-s:ikkut # ;
++kkut+tn-via-s:ikkut QParticles ;
++kkut+tn-via-s:ikkut AfterViaCaseEnding ;
++kkut+tn-via-s:SUPPRkkut # ;
++kkut+tn-via-s:SUPPRkkut QParticles ;
++kkut+tn-via-s:SUPPRkkut AfterViaCaseEnding ;
++kkut+tn-via-d:iikkut # ;
++kkut+tn-via-d:iikkut QParticles ;
++kkut+tn-via-d:iikkut AfterViaCaseEnding ;
++kkut+tn-via-d:SUPPRTNNOMDkkut # ;
++kkut+tn-via-d:SUPPRTNNOMDkkut QParticles ;
++kkut+tn-via-d:SUPPRTNNOMDkkut AfterViaCaseEnding ;
++kkut+tn-via-d:SUPPRkkut # ;
++kkut+tn-via-d:SUPPRkkut QParticles ;
++kkut+tn-via-d:SUPPRkkut AfterViaCaseEnding ;
++tigut+tn-via-p:tigut # ;
++tigut+tn-via-p:tigut QParticles ;
++tigut+tn-via-p:tigut AfterViaCaseEnding ;
++tigut+tn-via-p:KGUARDtigut # ;
++tigut+tn-via-p:KGUARDtigut QParticles ;
++tigut+tn-via-p:KGUARDtigut AfterViaCaseEnding ;
++tigut+tn-via-p:itigut # ;
++tigut+tn-via-p:itigut QParticles ;
++tigut+tn-via-p:itigut AfterViaCaseEnding ;
++ga+tn-nom-s-1s:ga # ;
++ga+tn-nom-s-1s:ga QParticles ;
++ga+tn-nom-s-1s:iga # ;
++ga+tn-nom-s-1s:iga QParticles ;
++ga+tn-nom-s-1s:SUPPRga # ;
++ga+tn-nom-s-1s:SUPPRga QParticles ;
++ga+tn-nom-s-1s:SUPPRra # ;
++ga+tn-nom-s-1s:SUPPRra QParticles ;
++kka+tn-nom-d-1s:iikka # ;
++kka+tn-nom-d-1s:iikka QParticles ;
++kka+tn-nom-d-1s:SUPPRTNNOMDkka # ;
++kka+tn-nom-d-1s:SUPPRTNNOMDkka QParticles ;
++kka+tn-nom-d-1s:SUPPRkka # ;
++kka+tn-nom-d-1s:SUPPRkka QParticles ;
++kka+tn-nom-p-1s:kka # ;
++kka+tn-nom-p-1s:kka QParticles ;
++kka+tn-nom-p-1s:ikka # ;
++kka+tn-nom-p-1s:ikka QParticles ;
++kka+tn-nom-p-1s:SUPPRkka # ;
++kka+tn-nom-p-1s:SUPPRkka QParticles ;
++ma+tn-gen-s-1s:ma # ;
++ma+tn-gen-s-1s:ma QParticles ;
++ma+tn-gen-s-1s:SUPPRma # ;
++ma+tn-gen-s-1s:SUPPRma QParticles ;
++ma+tn-gen-s-1s:NASALma # ;
++ma+tn-gen-s-1s:NASALma QParticles ;
++kka+tn-gen-d-1s:TNNOMDkka # ;
++kka+tn-gen-d-1s:TNNOMDkka QParticles ;
++kka+tn-gen-d-1s:kka # ;
++kka+tn-gen-d-1s:kka QParticles ;
++kka+tn-gen-d-1s:TNNOMDngma # ;
++kka+tn-gen-d-1s:TNNOMDngma QParticles ;
++kka+tn-gen-d-1s:ngma # ;
++kka+tn-gen-d-1s:ngma QParticles ;
++kka+tn-gen-d-1s:iikka # ;
++kka+tn-gen-d-1s:iikka QParticles ;
++kka+tn-gen-d-1s:iingma # ;
++kka+tn-gen-d-1s:iingma QParticles ;
++kka+tn-gen-d-1s:SUPPRTNNOMDkka # ;
++kka+tn-gen-d-1s:SUPPRTNNOMDkka QParticles ;
++kka+tn-gen-d-1s:SUPPRkka # ;
++kka+tn-gen-d-1s:SUPPRkka QParticles ;
++kka+tn-gen-d-1s:SUPPRTNNOMDngma # ;
++kka+tn-gen-d-1s:SUPPRTNNOMDngma QParticles ;
++kka+tn-gen-d-1s:SUPPRngma # ;
++kka+tn-gen-d-1s:SUPPRngma QParticles ;
++kka+tn-gen-p-1s:kka # ;
++kka+tn-gen-p-1s:kka QParticles ;
++kka+tn-gen-p-1s:ikka # ;
++kka+tn-gen-p-1s:ikka QParticles ;
++kka+tn-gen-p-1s:SUPPRkka # ;
++kka+tn-gen-p-1s:SUPPRkka QParticles ;
++mnik+tn-acc-s-1s:mnik # ;
++mnik+tn-acc-s-1s:mnik QParticles ;
++mnik+tn-acc-s-1s:imnik # ;
++mnik+tn-acc-s-1s:imnik QParticles ;
++mnik+tn-acc-s-1s:SUPPRmnik # ;
++mnik+tn-acc-s-1s:SUPPRmnik QParticles ;
++mnik+tn-acc-d-1s:TNNOMDmnik # ;
++mnik+tn-acc-d-1s:TNNOMDmnik QParticles ;
++mnik+tn-acc-d-1s:mnik # ;
++mnik+tn-acc-d-1s:mnik QParticles ;
++mnik+tn-acc-d-1s:iimnik # ;
++mnik+tn-acc-d-1s:iimnik QParticles ;
++mnik+tn-acc-d-1s:SUPPRTNNOMDmnik # ;
++mnik+tn-acc-d-1s:SUPPRTNNOMDmnik QParticles ;
++mnik+tn-acc-d-1s:SUPPRmnik # ;
++mnik+tn-acc-d-1s:SUPPRmnik QParticles ;
++mnik+tn-acc-p-1s:mnik # ;
++mnik+tn-acc-p-1s:mnik QParticles ;
++mnik+tn-acc-p-1s:imnik # ;
++mnik+tn-acc-p-1s:imnik QParticles ;
++mnik+tn-acc-p-1s:SUPPRmnik # ;
++mnik+tn-acc-p-1s:SUPPRmnik QParticles ;
++mnut+tn-dat-s-1s:mnut # ;
++mnut+tn-dat-s-1s:mnut QParticles ;
++mnut+tn-dat-s-1s:mnut AfterDatCaseEnding ;
++mnut+tn-dat-s-1s:imnut # ;
++mnut+tn-dat-s-1s:imnut QParticles ;
++mnut+tn-dat-s-1s:imnut AfterDatCaseEnding ;
++mnut+tn-dat-s-1s:SUPPRmnut # ;
